Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.290

Funeral directors and embalmers subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.

Funeral directors and embalmers, licensed under chapter 18.39 RCW, are subject to the provisions of chapter 18.130 RCW under the administration of the department of licensing. The department of licensing shall review the statutes authorizing the regulation of funeral directors and embalmers, and recommend any changes necessary by January 1, 1990.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 323.]